liblouis/share/liblouis/tables/_translation_zh-TW-g0.ctb
#Japanese characters
always \x304d\x3083 4-16
always \x304d\x3085 4-146
always \x304d\x3087 4-246
always \x3057\x3083 4-156
always \x3057\x3085 4-1456
always \x3057\x3087 4-2456
always \x3061\x3083 4-135
always \x3061\x3085 4-1345
always \x3061\x3087 4-2345
always \x306b\x3083 4-13
always \x306b\x3085 4-134
always \x306b\x3087 4-234
always \x3072\x3083 4-136
always \x3072\x3085 4-1346
always \x3072\x3087 4-2346
always \x307f\x3083 4-1356
always \x307f\x3085 4-13456
always \x307f\x3087 4-23456
always \x308a\x3083 4-15
always \x308a\x3085 4-145
always \x308a\x3087 4-245
always \x304e\x3083 45-16
always \x304e\x3085 45-146
always \x304e\x3087 45-246
always \x3058\x3083 45-156
always \x3058\x3085 45-1456
always \x3058\x3087 45-2456
always \x3073\x3083 45-136
always \x3073\x3085 45-1346
always \x3073\x3087 45-2346
always \x3074\x3083 46-136
always \x3074\x3085 46-1346
always \x3074\x3087 46-2346
always \xff76\xff9e 5-16
always \xff77\xff9e 5-126
always \xff78\xff9e 5-146
always \xff79\xff9e 5-1246
always \xff7a\xff9e 5-246
always \xff7b\xff9e 5-156
always \xff7c\xff9e 5-1256
always \xff7d\xff9e 5-1456
always \xff7e\xff9e 5-12456
always \xff7f\xff9e 5-2456
always \xFF80\xFF9E 5-135
always \xff81\xff9e 5-1235
always \xff82\xff9e 5-1345
always \xff83\xff9e 5-12345
always \xff84\xff9e 5-2345
always \xff8a\xff9e 5-136
always \xff8b\xff9e 5-1236
always \xff8c\xff9e 5-1346
always \xff8d\xff9e 5-12346
always \xff8e\xff9e 5-2346
always \xff8a\xff9f 6-136
always \xff8b\xff9f 6-1236
always \xff8c\xff9f 6-1346
always \xff8d\xff9f 6-12346
always \xff8e\xff9f 6-2346
always \xff77\xff6c 4-16
always \xff77\xff6d 4-146
always \xff77\xff6e 4-246
always \xff7c\xff6c 4-156
always \xff7c\xff6d 4-1456
always \xff7c\xff6e 4-2456
always \xff81\xff6c 4-135
always \xff81\xff6d 4-1345
always \xff81\xff6e 4-2345
always \xff86\xff6c 4-13
always \xff86\xff6d 4-134
always \xff86\xff6e 4-234
always \xff8b\xff6c 4-136
always \xff8b\xff6d 4-1346
always \xff8b\xff6e 4-2346
always \xff90\xff6c 4-1356
always \xff90\xff6d 4-13456
always \xff90\xff6e 4-23456
always \xff98\xff6c 4-15
always \xff98\xff6d 4-145
always \xff98\xff6e 4-245
always \xFF77\xFF9E\xFF6C 45-16
always \xFF77\xFF9E\xFF6D 45-146
always \xFF77\xFF9E\xFF6E 45-246
always \xFF7C\xFF9E\xFF6C 45-156
always \xFF7C\xFF9E\xFF6D 45-1456
always \xFF7C\xFF9E\xFF6E 45-2456
always \xFF8B\xFF9E\xFF6C 45-136
always \xFF8B\xFF9E\xFF6D 45-1346
always \xFF8B\xFF9E\xFF6E 45-2346
always \xFF8B\xFF9F\xFF6C 46-136
always \xFF8B\xFF9F\xFF6D 46-1346
always \xFF8B\xFF9F\xFF6E 46-2346
#Chinese phrases
always \x4e00\x4e86 16-3-14-246-4
always \x4e00\x5339 16-3-1234-16-4
always \x4e00\x64ae 16-3-245-25-5
always \x4e00\x64c1 16-3-235-3
always \x4e00\x66b4 16-3-1234-34-5
always \x4e00\x671d 16-3-1-146-3
always \x4e00\x8457 16-3-1-25-2
always \x4e00\x884c 16-3-1235-1346-2
always \x4e00\x89ba 16-3-13-246-5
always \x4e09\x66f4 15-1236-3-13-13456-3
always \x4e09\x7701 15-1236-3-15-13456-4
always \x4e09\x884c 15-1236-3-1235-1346-2
always \x4e09\x91cd 15-1236-3-12-12346-2
always \x4e0a\x4f9b 24-1346-5-13-12346-5
always \x4e0a\x5c07 24-1346-5-13-46-5
always \x4e0a\x7576 24-1346-5-145-1346-5
always \x4e0a\x76f8 24-1346-5-15-46-5
always \x4e0a\x8072 24-1346-4-24-1356-3
always \x4e0b\x5b50 15-23456-5-125-156-1
always \x4e0d\x4e2d 135-34-5-1-12346-5
always \x4e0d\x4e86 135-34-5-14-246-4
always \x4e0d\x52dd 135-34-5-24-1356-3
always \x4e0d\x7576 135-34-5-145-1346-5
always \x4e0d\x7701 135-34-5-15-13456-4
always \x4e0d\x7981 135-34-5-13-1456-3
always \x4e0d\x820d 135-34-5-24-2346-4
always \x4e0d\x8457 135-34-5-1-146-2
always \x4e0d\x963f 135-34-5-2346-3
always \x4e0d\x9bae 135-34-5-15-2345-4
always \x4e1e\x76f8 12-1356-2-15-46-5
always \x4e2d\x50b7 1-12346-5-24-1346-3
always \x4e2d\x610f 1-12346-5-16-5
always \x4e2d\x6691 1-12346-5-24-34-4
always \x4e2d\x6bd2 1-12346-5-145-34-2
always \x4e2d\x734e 1-12346-5-13-46-4
always \x4e2d\x80af 1-12346-5-123-136-4
always \x4e2d\x8209 1-12346-5-13-1256-4
always \x4e2d\x8a08 1-12346-5-13-16-5
always \x4e2d\x98a8 1-12346-5-12345-1356-3
always \x4e38\x5b50 12456-2-125-156-1
always \x4e3b\x5c07 1-34-4-13-46-5
always \x4e58\x8208 12-1356-2-15-13456-5
always \x4e7e\x5609 245-2345-2-13-23456-3
always \x4e7e\x5764 245-2345-2-123-123456-3
always \x4e7e\x9686 245-2345-2-14-12346-2
always \x4e82\x5b50 14-12456-5-125-156-1
always \x4e86\x4e86 14-246-4-14-246-4
always \x4e86\x4e8b 14-246-4-24-156-5
always \x4e86\x5f97 14-246-4-145-2346-2
always \x4e86\x609f 14-246-4-34-5
always \x4e86\x65b7 14-246-4-145-12456-5
always \x4e86\x7136 14-246-4-1245-1236-2
always \x4e86\x7d50 14-246-4-13-346-2
always \x4e86\x89e3 14-246-4-13-346-4
always \x4e94\x66f4 34-4-13-13456-3
always \x4ea4\x5377 13-246-3-13-45-5
always \x4ea4\x60e1 13-246-3-34-5
always \x4ea4\x81c2 13-246-3-135-16-5
always \x4ea4\x9084 13-246-3-1235-12456-2
always \x4eac\x90fd 13-13456-3-145-34-3
always \x4ead\x5b50 124-13456-2-125-156-1
always \x4eae\x76f8 14-46-5-15-46-5
always \x4eb6\x7236 145-1236-4-12345-34-4
always \x4eba\x53c3 1245-136-2-24-136-3
always \x4ec0\x4e48 24-2346-2-134-2346-1
always \x4ec0\x9ebc 24-2346-2-134-2346-1
always \x4f11\x5047 15-234-3-13-23456-5
always \x4f19\x5b50 1235-25-4-125-156-1
always \x4f3a\x5019 245-156-5-1235-12356-5
always \x4f4d\x5b50 1246-5-125-156-1
always \x4f5d\x50c2 123-12356-5-14-12356-2
always \x4f86\x964d 14-2456-2-15-46-2
always \x4f8b\x5047 14-16-5-13-23456-5
always \x4f8b\x5b50 14-16-5-125-156-1
always \x4f9b\x54c1 13-12346-5-1234-1456-4
always \x4f9b\x61c9 13-12346-3-13456-5
always \x4f9b\x684c 13-12346-5-1-25-3
always \x4f9b\x7d66 13-12346-3-13-16-4
always \x4f9b\x8a5e 13-12346-5-245-156-2
always \x4f9b\x990a 13-12346-5-46-5
always \x4f9d\x508d 16-3-135-1346-5
always \x4fbf\x5b9c 1234-2345-2-16-2
always \x4fe1\x5dee 15-1456-5-12-2456-3
always \x4fef\x755c 12345-34-4-15-1256-5
always \x4ff8\x7d66 12345-1356-5-13-16-4
always \x5009\x5352 245-1346-3-245-34-5
always \x5009\x9821 245-1346-3-13-346-2
always \x500b\x5b50 13-2346-5-125-156-1
always \x5014\x5f37 13-236-2-13-46-5
always \x5047\x65e5 13-23456-5-1245-156-5
always \x5047\x671f 13-23456-5-245-16-2
always \x504f\x597d 1234-2345-3-1235-146-5
always \x5065\x5c07 13-2345-5-13-46-5
always \x50b3\x8a18 1-12456-5-13-16-5
always \x5110\x76f8 135-1456-3-15-46-5
always \x5112\x5c07 1245-34-2-13-46-5
always \x511f\x9084 12-1346-2-1235-12456-2
always \x5141\x7576 256-4-145-1346-5
always \x5144\x9577 15-235-3-1-1346-4
always \x5145\x5206 12-12346-3-12345-136-5
always \x5145\x585e 12-12346-3-15-2346-5
always \x514b\x96e3 123-2346-5-1345-1236-5
always \x5152\x5b50 156-2-125-156-1
always \x5154\x5b50 124-34-5-125-156-1
always \x5165\x76f8 1245-34-5-15-46-5
always \x5167\x61c9 1345-356-5-13456-5
always \x5167\x76f8 1345-356-5-15-46-5
always \x5167\x7701 1345-356-5-15-13456-4
always \x5167\x884c 1345-356-5-1235-1346-2
always \x516c\x5dee 13-12346-3-12-2456-3
always \x516c\x64ae 13-12346-3-245-25-5
always \x5171\x8655 13-12346-5-12-34-4
always \x5178\x7576 145-2345-4-145-1346-5
always \x517c\x5dee 13-2345-3-12-2456-3
always \x518a\x5b50 245-2346-5-125-156-1
always \x51a0\x5195 13-12456-3-134-2345-4
always \x51a0\x84cb 13-12456-3-13-2456-5
always \x51b7\x85cf 14-1356-4-245-1346-2
always \x51f1\x6492 123-2456-4-15-345-3
always \x51f3\x5b50 145-1356-5-125-156-1
always \x51fa\x5c07 12-34-3-13-46-5
always \x51fa\x5dee 12-34-3-12-2456-3
always \x51fa\x6c92 12-34-3-134-126-5
always \x5200\x5b50 145-146-3-125-156-1
always \x5206\x5167 12345-136-5-1345-356-5
always \x5206\x5916 12345-136-5-2356-5
always \x5206\x5b50 12345-136-5-125-156-4
always \x5206\x884c 12345-136-3-1235-1346-2
always \x5206\x91cf 12345-136-5-14-46-5
always \x5207\x63db 245-346-3-1235-12456-5
always \x5207\x9664 245-346-3-12-34-2
always \x5217\x50b3 14-346-5-1-12456-5
always \x5228\x571f 1234-146-2-124-34-4
always \x5228\x5730 1234-146-2-145-16-5
always \x5228\x5b50 1234-146-2-125-156-1
always \x5237\x5b50 24-35-3-125-156-1
always \x524e\x8eca 24-345-5-12-2346-3
always \x524e\x90a3 12-345-5-1345-25-2
always \x525d\x524a 135-126-3-15-236-3
always \x526f\x5c07 12345-34-5-13-46-5
always \x5275\x75d5 12-456-3-1235-136-2
always \x52a9\x9577 1-34-5-1-1346-4
always \x52c7\x5c07 235-4-13-46-5
always \x52c9\x5f37 134-2345-4-245-46-4
always \x52d2\x5012 14-356-3-145-146-4
always \x52d2\x50b7 14-356-3-24-1346-3
always \x52d2\x660f 14-356-3-1235-123456-3
always \x52d2\x6b7b 14-356-3-15-156-4
always \x52d2\x75d5 14-356-3-1235-136-2
always \x52d5\x8108 145-12346-5-134-2456-5
always \x52dd\x4efb 24-1356-3-1245-136-5
always \x52dd\x6578 24-1356-3-24-34-4
always \x52de\x8ecd 14-146-5-13-256-3
always \x52f8\x964d 245-45-5-15-46-2
always \x52fa\x5b50 24-146-2-125-156-1
always \x52fb\x7a31 256-2-12-136-5
always \x52fe\x7576 13-12356-3-145-1346-5
always \x5305\x5b50 135-146-3-125-156-1
always \x5305\x85cf 135-146-3-245-1346-2
always \x5315\x898b 135-16-4-15-2345-5
always \x5316\x5b50 1235-35-3-125-156-1
always \x5317\x4f10 135-356-4-12345-345-3
always \x5323\x5b50 15-23456-2-125-156-1
always \x5339\x592b 1234-16-4-12345-34-3
always \x5339\x5a66 1234-16-4-12345-34-5
always \x5339\x6575 1234-16-4-145-16-2
always \x5339\x914d 1234-16-4-1234-356-5
always \x5340\x9577 245-1256-3-1-1346-4
always \x5341\x884c 24-156-2-1235-1346-2
always \x5343\x4e58 245-2345-3-24-1356-5
always \x5348\x89ba 34-4-13-246-5
always \x534a\x8f09 135-1236-5-125-2456-4
always \x5352\x5b50 125-34-2-125-156-1
always \x5353\x8457 1-25-2-1-34-5
always \x5354\x8abf 15-346-2-124-246-2
always \x5357\x7121 1345-1236-2-134-126-2
always \x5360\x535c 1-1236-3-135-34-4
always \x5360\x661f 1-1236-3-15-13456-3
always \x5371\x96e3 1246-2-1345-1236-5
always \x5377\x5b50 13-45-5-125-156-1
always \x5377\x5b97 13-45-5-125-12346-3
always \x537f\x76f8 245-13456-3-15-46-5
always \x539f\x8457 45-2-1-34-5
always \x53ad\x60e1 2345-5-34-5
always \x53bb\x8108 245-1256-5-134-2456-5
always \x53c3\x5546 24-136-3-24-1346-3
always \x53c3\x5c07 245-1236-3-13-46-5
always \x53c3\x5dee 245-136-3-245-156-3
always \x53c3\x8207 245-1236-3-1256-5
always \x53c9\x5b50 12-345-3-125-156-1
always \x53cd\x61c9 12345-1236-4-13456-5
always \x53cd\x76f8 12345-1236-4-15-46-5
always \x53cd\x7701 12345-1236-4-15-13456-4
always \x53cd\x9593 12345-1236-4-13-2345-5
always \x53d7\x964d 24-12356-5-15-46-2
always \x53d7\x96e3 24-12356-5-1345-1236-5
always \x53e3\x4f9b 123-12356-4-13-12346-5
always \x53e3\x5403 123-12356-4-13-16-2
always \x53e3\x5b50 123-12356-4-125-156-1
always \x53e4\x73a9 13-34-4-12456-5
always \x53e5\x5b50 13-1256-5-125-156-1
always \x53e5\x8e10 13-12356-3-13-2345-5
always \x53ef\x60e1 123-2346-4-34-5
always \x53ef\x6578 123-2346-4-24-34-4
always \x53ef\x6c57 123-2346-5-1235-1236-2
always \x53f0\x5b50 124-2456-2-125-156-1
always \x53f8\x9577 15-156-3-1-1346-4
always \x5404\x884c 13-2346-5-1235-1346-2
always \x5406\x559d 246-3-1235-2346-5
always \x540a\x5b50 145-246-5-125-156-1
always \x540d\x5206 134-13456-2-12345-136-5
always \x540d\x5c07 134-13456-2-13-46-5
always \x540d\x8457 134-13456-2-1-34-5
always \x5410\x8543 124-34-4-12345-1236-3
always \x541e\x6c92 124-123456-3-134-126-5
always \x5426\x6975 1234-16-4-13-16-2
always \x542b\x6df7 1235-1236-2-1235-123456-4
always \x5446\x5b50 145-2456-3-125-156-1
always \x544a\x5047 13-146-5-13-23456-5
always \x5462\x5462 1345-16-2-1345-16-2
always \x5462\x5583 1345-16-2-1345-1236-2
always \x5462\x7d68 1345-16-2-1245-12346-2
always \x547c\x61c9 1235-34-3-13456-5
always \x547d\x8108 134-13456-5-134-2456-5
always \x5486\x54ee 1234-146-2-15-246-3
always \x548b\x820c 125-2346-2-24-2346-2
always \x54b6\x566a 13-35-3-125-146-5
always \x54bd\x5589 2345-3-1235-12356-2
always \x54c0\x865f 2456-3-1235-146-2
always \x54c1\x884c 1234-1456-4-15-13456-5
always \x54c4\x9a19 1235-12346-4-1234-2345-5
always \x54c6\x55e6 145-25-3-15-25-3
always \x54c8\x5587 123-345-3-14-345-1
always \x54e8\x5b50 24-146-5-125-156-1
always \x54e9\x5695 14-16-3-14-34-3
always \x54ed\x865f 123-34-3-1235-146-2
always \x54ee\x5598 15-246-3-12-12456-4
always \x54fd\x54bd 13-1356-4-346-5
always \x5531\x548c 12-1346-5-1235-2346-5
